Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-714
Privileged communications; not grounds for excluding evidence.

The privileged communication between patient and physician, between client and professional counselor, and between husband and wife shall not be a ground for excluding evidence in any judicial proceeding resulting from a report of child abuse or neglect required by section 28-711.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 153;

Laws 1993, LB 130, § 4;

Laws 1994, LB 1035, § 4;

Laws 2005, LB 116, § 5.